Maryland, session 2026, SB0031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT
TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING AND THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
(B) (1) THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) THE SCHOOL ZONE BOUNDARIES AND ATTENDANCE AREA
MAP; AND
(II) THE LOCATIONS OF EACH STUDENT’S RESIDENCE; AND
(III) THE STATE–RATED CAPACITY, STUDENT POPULATION, AND
CAPACITY PERCENTAGE OF EACH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY CENSUS TRACT AND
BLOCK DATA REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–113.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REPORT MAY NOT INCLUDE PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION OF A STUDENT.
(C) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING FORMATTING AND SUBMISSION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE STUDENT RESIDENCY AND SCHOOL ZONES REPORT.
4–149.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES MASTER PLAN”
MEANS THE ANNUAL PLAN REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED TO THE INTERAGENCY
COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION UNDER COMAR 14.39.02.03.
(B) IN DEVELOPING A LOCAL EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES MASTER PLAN, A
COUNTY BOARD SHALL:
(1) CONSULT WITH EACH MUNICIPALITY LOCATED IN THE COUNTY
THAT EXERCISES PLANNING AND ZONING AUTHORITY; AND

SENATE BILL 31 3
(2) INCORPORATE DATA PROVIDED BY THE MUNICIPALITIES INTO
THE PLAN’S ENROLLMENT PROJECTIONS AND ANALYSIS OF FUTURE FACILITY
NEEDS.
Article – Land Use
7–106.
A COUNTY’S IF A COUNTY ENACTS AN ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITIES
ORDINANCE THAT RESTRICTS HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ON THE BASIS OF SCHOOL
CAPACITY INCLUDES A DEFINITE MAXIMUM LENGTH OF TIME TO RESTRICT OR LIMIT
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ON THE BASIS OF SCHOOL CAPACITY, THE ORDINANCE:
(1) MAY NOT DELAY THE PROCESSING AND COMPLETION OF
SUBDIVISION OR SITE DEVELOPMENT PLANS; BUT
(2) MAY DELAY THE ISSUANCE OF FINAL PERMITS INITIATION OF
CONSTRUCTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.